test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vuaggu_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - huáppu: # ok  
    huáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  huáppu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  huápun
    huáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  huápust
    huáppu+N+Sg+Com:  huáppoin
    huáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  huáputtáá
    huáppu+N+Ess:  huáppun
    huáppu+N+Par:  huáppud
    huáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  huápuh
    huáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  huápui
    huáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  huápuid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  huáppoid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  huápuin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Com:  [huápuiguin, huápuigijn]
    huáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  huápuittáá

  Noun - skuáppu: # ok  
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  skuáppu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  skuápun
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  skuápust
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Com:  skuáppoin
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  skuáputtáá
    skuáppu+N+Ess:  skuáppun
    skuáppu+N+Par:  skuáppud
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  skuápuh
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  skuápui
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  skuápuid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  skuáppoid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  skuápuin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Com:  [skuápuiguin, skuápuigijn]
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  skuápuittáá

  Noun - tuáttu: # ok LAAVU
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáttu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuátun
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuátust
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáttoin
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuátuttáá
    tuáttu+N+Ess:  tuáttun
    tuáttu+N+Par:  tuáttud
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuátuh
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuátui
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuátuid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáttoid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuátuin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Com:  [tuátuiguin, tuátuigijn]
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuátuittáá

  Noun - vuággu: # ok VUAGGU
    vuággu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuággu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuágun
    vuággu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuágust
    vuággu+N+Sg+Com:  vuággoin
    vuággu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáguttáá
    vuággu+N+Ess:  vuággun
    vuággu+N+Par:  vuággud
    vuággu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáguh
    vuággu+N+Pl+Gen: vuágui
    vuággu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáguid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuággoid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Com:  [vuáguiguin, vuáguigijn]
    vuággu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáguittáá

  Noun - uáinu: # ok KIAINU
    uáinu+N+Sg+Nom:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Gen:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Acc:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Ill:  uáinun
    uáinu+N+Sg+Loc:  uáinust
    uáinu+N+Sg+Com:  uáinoin
    uáinu+N+Sg+Abe:  uáinuttáá
    uáinu+N+Ess:  uáinun
    uáinu+N+Par:  uáinud
    uáinu+N+Pl+Nom:  uáinuh
    uáinu+N+Pl+Gen: uáinui
    uáinu+N+Pl+Acc:  uáinuid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Ill:  uáinoid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Loc:  uáinuin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Com:  [uáinuiguin, uáinuigijn]
    uáinu+N+Pl+Abe:  uáinuittáá


  Noun - kuáivu: # ok KIAINU
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáivust
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáivoin
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáivuttáá
    kuáivu+N+Ess:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Par:  kuáivud
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáivuh
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Gen: kuáivui
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáivuid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáivoid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáivuin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Com:  [kuáivuiguin, kuáivuigijn]
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáivuittáá

  Noun - kiäinu: # ok KIAINU
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäinust
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Com:  kiäinoin
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäinuttáá
    kiäinu+N+Ess:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Par:  kiäinud
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäinuh
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Gen: kiäinui
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäinuid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäinoid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäinuin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Com:  [kiäinuiguin, kiäinuigijn]
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäinuittáá
    
  Noun - vuábdu: # ok KIAINU
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuábdun
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuábdust
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Com:  vuábdoin
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuábduttáá
    vuábdu+N+Ess:  vuábdun
    vuábdu+N+Par:  vuábdud
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuábduh
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Gen: vuábdui
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuábduid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuábdoid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuábduin
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Com:  [vuábduiguin, vuábduigijn]
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuábduittáá

  Noun - luándu: # ok KIAINU
    luándu+N+Sg+Nom:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Gen:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Acc:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Ill:  luándun
    luándu+N+Sg+Loc:  luándust
    luándu+N+Sg+Com:  luándoin
    luándu+N+Sg+Abe:  luánduttáá
    luándu+N+Ess:  luándun
    luándu+N+Par:  luándud
    luándu+N+Pl+Nom:  luánduh
    luándu+N+Pl+Gen: luándui
    luándu+N+Pl+Acc:  luánduid
    luándu+N+Pl+Ill:  luándoid
    luándu+N+Pl+Loc:  luánduin
    luándu+N+Pl+Com:  [luánduiguin, luánduigijn]
    luándu+N+Pl+Abe:  luánduittáá

  Noun - nuárju: # ok KIAINU
    nuárju+N+Sg+Nom:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Gen:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Ill:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Sg+Loc:  nuárjust
    nuárju+N+Sg+Com:  nuárjoin
    nuárju+N+Sg+Abe:  nuárjuttáá
    nuárju+N+Ess:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Par:  nuárjud
    nuárju+N+Pl+Nom:  nuárjuh
    nuárju+N+Pl+Gen: nuárjui
    nuárju+N+Pl+Acc:  nuárjuid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Ill:  nuárjoid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Loc:  nuárjuin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Com:  [nuárjuiguin, nuárjuigijn]
    nuárju+N+Pl+Abe:  nuárjuittáá

  Noun - kuávlu: # ok KIAINU
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávlust
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Com:  kuávloin
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuávluttáá
    kuávlu+N+Ess:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Par:  kuávlud
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávluh
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Gen: kuávlui
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávluid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávloid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávluin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Com:  [kuávluiguin, kuávluigijn]
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuávluittáá

  Noun - kuáhtu: # ok KIAINU
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhtun
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáhtust
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáhtoin
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáhtuttáá
    kuáhtu+N+Ess:  kuáhtun
    kuáhtu+N+Par:  kuáhtud
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáhtuh
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Gen:  kuáhtui
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáhtuid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáhtoid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáhtuin
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Com:  [kuáhtuiguin, kuáhtuigijn]
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáhtuittáá

  Noun - uástu: # ok KIAINU
    uástu+N+Sg+Nom:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Gen:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Acc:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Ill:  uástun
    uástu+N+Sg+Loc:  uástust
    uástu+N+Sg+Com:  uástoin
    uástu+N+Sg+Abe:  uástuttáá
    uástu+N+Ess:  uástun
    uástu+N+Par:  uástud
    uástu+N+Pl+Nom:  uástuh
    uástu+N+Pl+Gen:  uástui
    uástu+N+Pl+Acc:  uástuid
    uástu+N+Pl+Ill:  uástoid
    uástu+N+Pl+Loc:  uástuin
    uástu+N+Pl+Com:  [uástuiguin, uástuigijn]
    uástu+N+Pl+Abe:  uástuittáá

  Noun - tuáršu: # ok KIAINU
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáršun
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuáršust
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Com:  tuáršoin
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáršuttáá
    tuáršu+N+Ess:  tuáršun
    tuáršu+N+Par:  tuáršud
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáršuh
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Gen:  tuáršui
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáršuid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuáršoid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáršuin
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Com:  [tuáršuiguin, tuáršuigijn]
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáršuittáá

  Noun - piäldu: # ok KIAINU
    piäldu+N+Sg+Nom:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Acc:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Ill:  piäldun
    piäldu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäldust
    piäldu+N+Sg+Com:  piäldoin
    piäldu+N+Sg+Abe:  piälduttáá
    piäldu+N+Ess:  piäldun
    piäldu+N+Par:  piäldud
    piäldu+N+Pl+Nom:  piälduh
    piäldu+N+Pl+Gen:  piäldui
    piäldu+N+Pl+Acc:  piälduid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Ill:  piäldoid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Loc:  piälduin
    piäldu+N+Pl+Com:  [piälduiguin, piälduigijn]
    piäldu+N+Pl+Abe:  piälduittáá

  Noun - piärgu: # ok KIAINU
    piärgu+N+Sg+Nom:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Gen:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Acc:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Ill:  piärgun
    piärgu+N+Sg+Loc:  piärgust
    piärgu+N+Sg+Com:  piärgoin
    piärgu+N+Sg+Abe:  piärguttáá
    piärgu+N+Ess:  piärgun
    piärgu+N+Par:  piärgud
    piärgu+N+Pl+Nom:  piärguh
    piärgu+N+Pl+Gen:  piärgui
    piärgu+N+Pl+Acc:  piärguid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Ill:  piärgoid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Loc:  piärguin
    piärgu+N+Pl+Com:  [piärguiguin, piärguigijn]
    piärgu+N+Pl+Abe:  piärguittáá

  Noun - vuáisá: # removed from fadda to kiainu
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáisád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: vuáisái
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  [vuáisáiguin, vuáisáigijn]
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáisáittáá

  Noun - kiäčču: # ok 
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäčču
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäju
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäju
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäčun
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäjust
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Com:  kiäjoin
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäjuttáá
    kiäčču+N+Ess:  kiäččun
    kiäčču+N+Par:  kiäččud
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäjuh
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Gen: kiäjui
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäjuid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäjoid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäjuin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Com:  [kiäjuiguin, kiäjuigijn]
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäjuittáá

  Noun - suáittu: # ok 
    suáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  suáittu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  suáitun
    suáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  suáitust
    suáittu+N+Sg+Com:  suáittoin
    suáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  suáituttáá
    suáittu+N+Ess:  suáittun
    suáittu+N+Par:  suáittud
    suáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  suáituh
    suáittu+N+Pl+Gen: suáitui
    suáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  suáituid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  suáittoid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  suáituin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Com:  [suáituiguin, suáituigijn]
    suáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  suáituittáá


  Noun - juávkku: # ok 
    juávkku+N+Sg+Nom:  juávkku
    juávkku+N+Sg+Gen:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Acc:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Ill:  juávkun
    juávkku+N+Sg+Loc:  juávhust
    juávkku+N+Sg+Com:  juávhoin
    juávkku+N+Sg+Abe:  juávhuttáá
    juávkku+N+Ess:  juávkkun
    juávkku+N+Par:  juávkkud
    juávkku+N+Pl+Nom:  juávhuh
    juávkku+N+Pl+Gen: juávhui
    juávkku+N+Pl+Acc:  juávhuid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Ill:  juávhoid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Loc:  juávhuin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Com:  [juávhuiguin, juávhuiguin]
    juávkku+N+Pl+Abe:  juávhuittáá

  Noun - puákku: # ok 
    puákku+N+Sg+Nom:  puákku
    puákku+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Ill:  puákun
    puákku+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhust
    puákku+N+Sg+Com:  puáhhoin
    puákku+N+Sg+Abe:  puáhuttáá
    puákku+N+Ess:  puákkun
    puákku+N+Par:  puákkud
    puákku+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhuh
    puákku+N+Pl+Gen:  puáhui
    puákku+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhuid
    puákku+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhhoid
    puákku+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhuin
    puákku+N+Pl+Com:  [puáhuiguin, puáhuigijn]
    puákku+N+Pl+Abe:  puáhuittáá

  Noun - ruávvu: # ok 
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruávvu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruávu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruávu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruávun
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruávust
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávvoin
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruávuttáá
    ruávvu+N+Ess:  ruávvun
    ruávvu+N+Par:  ruávvud
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruávuh
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Gen:  ruávui
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruávuid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruávuin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Com:  [ruávuiguin, ruávuigijn]
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruávuittáá
